New York, session 2025-2026, A10295.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 202-m to 2 read as follows: 3 § 202-m. Leave of absence for preventative health care granted to 4 employees. 1. An employer shall grant four hours of leave of absence in 5 any twelve-month period to an employee who seeks to undergo preventative 6 health care measures, including, but not limited to, physical examina- 7 tions, cancer screenings, medical procedures, monitoring and testing, 8 and discussions with a health care provider related to such employee's 9 health. 10 2. An employer shall not retaliate against an employee for requesting 11 or obtaining a leave of absence under this section. 12 3. This section shall not prevent an employer from providing leave for 13 preventative health care measures in addition to leave allowed under any 14 other provision of law. This section shall not affect an employee's 15 rights with respect to any other employee benefit otherwise provided by 16 law. 17 4. The commissioner is hereby authorized and directed to establish any 18 necessary guidelines, including requirements for notice, request and 19 approval of leave, and documentation, for the timely implementation of 20 the program. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14555-01-6